Tennessee, session 114, HB2616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-44-102, is amended by adding the
following subsection (e):
(e) Executive sessions for consideration of employment of director-level staff by
a governing body:
(1) An executive session may be conducted by a governing body to
interview applicants for employment as director-level staff of the body. Public
notice of such an executive session is not required;
(2) Decisions may not be made in the executive session but must be
deliberated and voted on in an open, publicly noticed meeting;
(3) The minutes of such session shall disclose all persons who were in
attendance except job applicants who attend for the purpose of being interviewed
by said body;
(4) Attendance is limited to members of said body, relevant staff invited
by the body, and job applicants;
(5) Further, to review and consider the contents of an application for
employment or appointment by said body, a job applicant may request that the
applicant's application remain confidential; and
(6) Upon being selected for employment or appointment, the selected
applicant's interview, if recorded, and application may be subject to a public
HB2616
012389
- 1 -

records request pursuant to § 10–7–503. Notwithstanding § 10-7-503, the
application and interview of applicants not selected must remain confidential
upon request.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012389